Missouri, session 2026, SB1080.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 43.265, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 43.265,
to read as follows:
43.265. There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Highway Patrol's Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and
Watercraft Revolving Fund", which shall be administered by
the superintendent of the highway patrol. All funds
received by the highway patrol from:
(1) Any source for purchase and maintenance of highway
patrol motor vehicles, watercraft, watercraft motors, and
trailers;
(2) Any source for reimbursement of costs associated
with the official use of highway patrol vehicles;
(3) Any source for restitution for damage to or loss
of a highway patrol vehicle or aircraft;
(4) Any other source for the purchase and maintenance
of highway patrol aircraft or aircraft parts; and
(5) Government agencies for the reimbursement of costs
associated with aircraft flights flown on their behalf by
the highway patrol;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1080 2
shall be credited to the fund. The state treasurer is the
custodian of the fund and shall approve disbursements from
the fund subject to appropriation and as provided by law and
the constitution of this state at the request of the
superintendent of the highway patrol. The balances from
this fund shall be used for the purchase and maintenance of
highway patrol motor vehicles, highway patrol watercraft,
watercraft motors, and trailers, highway patrol aircraft or
aircraft parts and operational costs. Prior to obligating
any funds for the purchase of an individual unit that costs
in excess of [one] five hundred thousand dollars, the
highway patrol shall receive a specific appropriation from
the general assembly for the particular purchase. Any
unexpended balance in the fund at the end of the fiscal year
shall be exempt from the provisions of section 33.080
relating to the transfer of unexpended balances to the
general revenue fund.
✓